Massachusetts, session 194th, H3950.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 119A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 51B the
following section:-
Section 51B½. (a) If a parent has an action plan developed by the department pursuant to
subsection (g) of section 51B for services related to the parent’s substance use disorder, as
defined by section 35 of chapter 123, the department shall allow the parent to direct the creation
of the plan, where appropriate, and shall meet with the parent prior to finalizing the plan.
(b) The department shall include in an action plan a list of available and accessible
resources for any service required under such plan.
(c) Where parenting time is restricted or limited and the parent has an action plan with the
department, the department shall include in the action plan objective standards that the parent
can meet in order to increase their parenting time, subject to approval by a court if necessary.
of 2

(d) A parent with substance use disorder shall be permitted to have a recovery coach or
an alcohol and drug counselor, licensed pursuant to chapter 111J, present in any meeting with an
employee of the department or a member of a multi-disciplinary team monitoring the action plan
pursuant to section 51D.
(e) If a parent with substance use disorder has an action plan with the department, the
department shall allow family counseling after the parent has maintained recovery for at least 6
months. The department shall permit family counseling only if appropriate and in the best
interests of the child.
(f) All department employees shall have training on issues related to substance use
disorders, which shall include training from peers with lived experience that are professionals
working in the department or another agency of the commonwealth. The department shall
consult with medical professionals and the persons working in or with lived experience in the
recovery community for the development and updating of training standards.
of 2